Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 13. Genetic Privacy.

Sec. 18.13.010.
Genetic testing.

Except as provided in (b) of this section,

a person may not collect a DNA sample from a person, perform a DNA analysis on a sample, retain a DNA sample or the results of a DNA analysis, or disclose the results of a DNA analysis unless the person has first obtained the informed and written consent of the person, or the person’s legal guardian or authorized representative, for the collection, analysis, retention, or disclosure;

a DNA sample and the results of a DNA analysis performed on the sample are the exclusive property of the person sampled or analyzed.

The prohibitions of (a) of this section do not apply to DNA samples collected and analyses conducted

under AS

44.41.035

or comparable provisions of another jurisdiction;

for a law enforcement purpose, including the identification of perpetrators and the investigation of crimes and the identification of missing or unidentified persons or deceased individuals;

for determining paternity;

to screen newborns as required by state or federal law;

for the purpose of emergency medical treatment.

A general authorization for the release of medical records or medical information may not be construed as the informed and written consent required by this section. The Department of Health and Social Services may by regulation adopt a uniform informed and written consent form to assist persons in meeting the requirements of this section. A person using that uniform informed and written consent is exempt from civil or criminal liability for actions taken under the consent form. A person may revoke or amend their informed and written consent at any time.

History.

(§ 1 ch 176 SLA 2004)

Sec. 18.13.020.
Private right of action.

A person may bring a civil action against a person who collects a DNA sample from the person, performs a DNA analysis on a sample, retains a DNA sample or the results of a DNA analysis, or discloses the results of a DNA analysis in violation of this chapter. In addition to the actual damages suffered by the person, a person violating this chapter shall be liable to the person for damages in the amount of $5,000 or, if the violation resulted in profit or monetary gain to the violator, $100,000.

History.

(§ 1 ch 176 SLA 2004)

Sec. 18.13.030.
Criminal penalty.

A person commits the crime of unlawful DNA collection, analysis, retention, or disclosure if the person knowingly collects a DNA sample from a person, performs a DNA analysis on a sample, retains a DNA sample or the results of a DNA analysis, or discloses the results of a DNA analysis in violation of this chapter.

In this section, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

Unlawful DNA collection, analysis, retention, or disclosure is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 176 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 18.13.100.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“DNA” means deoxyribonucleic acid, including mitochondrial DNA, complementary DNA, and DNA derived from ribonucleic acid;

“DNA analysis” means DNA or genetic typing and testing to determine the presence or absence of genetic characteristics in an individual, including tests of nucleic acids or chromosomes in order to diagnose or identify a genetic characteristic; “DNA analysis” does not include a routine physical measurement, a test for drugs, alcohol, cholesterol, or the human immunodeficiency virus, a chemical, blood, or urine analysis, or any other diagnostic test that is widely accepted and in use in clinical practice;

“genetic characteristic” includes a gene, chromosome, or alteration of a gene or chromosome that may be tested to determine the existence or risk of a disease, disorder, trait, propensity, or syndrome, or to identify an individual or a blood relative; “genetic characteristic” does not include family history or a genetically transmitted characteristic whose existence or identity is determined other than through a genetic test.

History.

(§ 1 ch 176 SLA 2004)